Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2396.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 3.732, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Claims of $7,000 or less. The head of each department or agency of the state, or a designee, acting on behalf of the state, deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end attempt to determine, adjust and settle, at any time, any claim for money damages of $7,000 or less against the state for injury to or loss of property or personal injury or death caused by an act or omission of any employee of the state while acting within the scope of office or employment, under circumstances where the state, if a private person, would be liable to the claimant. The settlement is final and conclusive on all officers of the state, unless procured by fraud. The acceptance by the claimant of a settlement is final and conclusive on the claimant and constitutes a complete release of any claim against the state and the employee of the state whose act or omission gave rise to the claim, by reason of the same subject matter.